Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Chapter 6 Enforcement; Penalties

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2001, House Joint Resolution No. 1, §§ 1 through 3, requests that Congress not reintroduce threatened or endangered species into the state of Wyoming without the consent and approval of the state and without providing the necessary funding.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water Rev. 479 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d Fish and Game §§ 57 to 61.

36A C.J.S. Fish §§ 38 to 46; 38 C.J.S. Game §§ 61 to 85.